Idaho, session 2025, H0082.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 36-1121, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-1121. LIVESTOCK DEPREDATION BY GRIZZLY BEAR AND WOLVES. (1) It is
the intent of the legislature to provide compensation to livestock owners
that have experienced depredation of livestock by grizzly bear and wolves.
(2) The Idaho state department of agriculture, in consultation with the
department of fish and game and the office of species conservation, is au-
thorized to carry out the purposes of this section and has spending authority
for compensation pursuant to this section to the extent of legislative ap-
propriation. The depredation of livestock and prevention fund is hereby es-
tablished in the state treasury. All expenditures from the fund will be paid
according to rules promulgated by the Idaho state department of agriculture.
Beginning on July 1, 2024, and each July 1 thereafter, the legislature shall
appropriate two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000) annually to
the fund. One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) of that amount shall
be used annually to compensate validated confirmed claims for depredation,
and seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) of that amount shall be used an-
nually for conflict prevention and the provision of information regarding
deterrents that have proven effective as determined pursuant to rule as pro-
mulgated by the Idaho state department of agriculture. All claims shall be
made to the office of species conservation on or before December 31 of each
year. Validated Confirmed claims for depredation shall be paid on a pro rata
basis in the event moneys in the fund are insufficient to pay all validated
confirmed claims in full, until such time as moneys in the fund are depleted.
Any moneys in the fund after payment of validated confirmed claims shall then
be paid to those livestock owners with probable claims for depredation on a
pro rata basis in the event moneys in the fund are insufficient to pay all
probable claims in full, until such moneys in the fund are depleted. Any mon-
eys in the fund after payment of claims deemed probable shall then be paid
to those livestock owners with claims reviewed and deemed possible on a pro
rata basis in the event moneys in the fund are insufficient to pay all pos-
sible claims in full, until such moneys in the fund are depleted. Any mon-
eys in the fund after probable possible depredation claims are paid shall be
carried over to the next calendar year. Interest accruing on moneys in the
fund shall be retained in the fund. Moneys shall be continuously appropri-
ated to the fund, but the fund shall not exceed four hundred thousand dollars
($400,000).


(3) Compensation for claims validated confirmed or deemed probable or
possible shall be based on current fair market value as provided by the Idaho
state department of agriculture. Any other compensation paid to a livestock
owner for depredation shall be deducted from the fair market value prior to
payment.
(4) For purposes of this section, "livestock" means cattle, sheep,
goat, swine, poultry, bees, llamas, or equine animals used for food or in the
production of food, fiber, feed, or other agriculture-based consumer prod-
ucts, domesticated game, or other nonplant life; such term shall not include
aquatic animals.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.